Illinois, session 104th, HB3992.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The amount of $6,100,000, or so much thereof as 5may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 6Fund to the Department of Agriculture for all costs associated 7with the Crop Insurance Rebate Initiative to provide 8incentives for at least 1,000,000 acres of eligible land. 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 102025.